Utah statutes.
63G-6-302.   Duty of chief procurement officer in maintaining specifications of supplies.

The chief procurement officer shall prepare, issue, revise, maintain, and monitor the use of specifications for supplies, services, and construction required by the state.  The chief procurement officer shall obtain expert advice and assistance from personnel of using agencies in the development of specifications and may delegate in writing to a using agency the authority to prepare and utilize its own specifications.  For a procurement process under Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 26, Government Procurement Private Proposal Program, any delegation by the chief procurement officer under this section shall be made to the Governor's Office of Economic Development.

